Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0999.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2567. (1) Except as provided in subsection (3), a register of deeds is entitled to the following fees, which are not taxable as costs except as indicated: (a) For entering and recording a document, regardless of the number of pages, $30.00, $34.00, which includes the fee required to be collected under section 2567a. In addition to remitting a portion of the fee to satisfy section 2567a, the register of deeds shall deposit $5.00 of the total fee collected for each recording into the automation fund established under section 2568. (b) For a document that assigns or discharges more than 1 instrument, in addition to the fee under subdivision (a), $3.00 for each additional instrument assigned or discharged. (c) For copies of any records or papers, if required, $1.00 per page, taxable as costs if otherwise allowed. (d) To certify a recorded document, $5.00. (e) For searching the records and files, on request, by the office of the register of deeds, 50 cents for each year for which grantor/grantee searches are made, with a minimum fee of $5.00, except that the fee for tract index searches must be based on the cost of establishing and maintaining a tract index. (f) For filing every other paper, and making an entry of it, if necessary, $1.00, unless otherwise specifically provided for. (g) For searching for every other paper, on request, by the office of the register of deeds, $1.00 for each paper examined. (2) A fee under subsection (1)(a) or (b) must be paid when the document is left for recording, unless 1 of the following applies: (a) If the document is a document as that term is defined in section 2 of the uniform real property electronic recording act, 2010 PA 123, MCL 565.842, the register of deeds accepts electronic documents for recording, and the fee is paid electronically, the fee must be paid within not later than 1 business day after receipt of the electronic document by the register of deeds. (b) If the document is a document left for recording by a governmental entity pursuant to an agreement between the governmental entity and the register of deeds that includes a payment schedule for the fee, the fee must be paid pursuant to the payment schedule. (c) If the document is a forfeiture certificate or a redemption certificate for tax delinquent property under section 78g of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.78g, the fee must be paid within not later than 30 days after redemption of the tax delinquent property or by an alternative date under an agreement between the register of deeds and the foreclosing governmental unit. (d) If the document is a notice of judgment of foreclosure under section 78k of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.78k, or a deed under section 78m of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.78m, for tax foreclosed property, the fee must be paid within not later than 30 days after the sale or transfer of the property or by an alternative date under an agreement between the register of deeds and the foreclosing governmental unit. (3) A charter county may impose a fee schedule by ordinance or resolution with different amounts than the amounts prescribed by subsection (1). A charter county shall not impose a fee that is greater than the cost of the service for which the fee is charged. (4) Subject to subsection (6), in addition to the recording fee under subsection (1), when a register of deeds accepts a discharge of lien under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15, to be recorded, the register of deeds shall collect an amount equal to the fee paid for recording the discharged lien as stated on the notice of lien recording fee provided under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15. The register of deeds shall transmit to the unemployment agency the additional amounts collected under this subsection and any information requested by the unemployment agency that is contained in the notice of lien recording fee. A register of deeds shall transmit the money and information on the following schedule: (a) If the register of deeds serves a county with a population of less than 750,000, on a quarterly basis. (b) If the register of deeds serves a county with a population of 750,000 or more, on a monthly basis. (5) Unless the discharge of lien is submitted to be recorded by the unemployment agency, a register of deeds shall not accept a discharge of lien under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15, for recording that is not accompanied by a notice of lien recording fee provided under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15. (6) A register of deeds shall not charge an additional amount under subsection (4) if the discharge of lien is submitted for recording by the unemployment agency. (7) As used in this section, "page" means 1 side of a single sheet of paper at least 8-1/2 inches by 11 inches in length and not exceeding 8-1/2 inches by 14 inches in length and not less than 20-pound weight. Sec. 2567a. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), (6), the county register of deeds shall collect a fee for recording any instrument. Before January 1, 2043, the fee is $4.00. $8.00. Beginning January 1, 2043, the fee is $2.00. $6.00. The fee must be paid when the instrument is left for record. (2) The fee required by this section is in addition to any fees required in section 2567 or fees or charges otherwise required by law for the recording of instruments. (3) The Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), the fees collected under this section must be remitted to the state treasurer quarterly, and must be deposited by the state treasurer in the state survey and remonumentation fund created in section 11 of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.271, except that a county may retain not more than 1-1/2% 1.5% of each fee collected under subsection (1) to cover the costs of administering this section. (4) From the fees collected and remitted to the state treasurer quarterly under this section, the state treasurer shall deposit $4.00 from each fee in the aerial imagery and mapping fund created in section 2567b. (5) (4) If, pursuant to a contract under section 8(5) of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.268, a county has expended funds to expedite the completion of its county plan, the county may apply not more than 50% of its annual grant revenue under section 12(1)(a) of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.272, to reimburse itself for these expenditures, until these expenditures have been fully reimbursed. (6) (5) This section does not apply to any of the following: (a) An agency of this state when filing or recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the state tax lien registration act, 1968 PA 203, MCL 211.681 to 211.687. (b) An individual or any public or private legal entity when recording a lien or discharge of a lien with the county register of deeds under section 15 of the Michigan employment security act, 1936 (Ex Sess) PA 1, MCL 421.15. (c) An agency of the federal government when filing or recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the uniform federal lien registration act, 1983 PA 102, MCL 211.661 to 211.668. (d) An individual or any public or private legal entity when recording any instrument with the county register of deeds under the uniform commercial code, 1962 PA 174, MCL 440.1101 to 440.9994. (e) A foreclosing governmental unit when recording any instrument required under sections 78 to 78o of the general property tax act, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.78 to 211.78o. (7) (6) As used in this section, "county plan" means a monumentation and remonumentation plan under described in section 8 of the state survey and remonumentation act, 1990 PA 345, MCL 54.268. Sec. 2567b. (1) The aerial imagery and mapping fund is created in the state treasury. (2) The state treasurer shall deposit money and other assets received from fees collected under section 2567a or from any other source in the fund. The state treasurer shall direct the investment of money in the fund and credit interest and earnings from the investments to the fund. (3) The department of technology, management, and budget is the administrator of the fund for audits of the fund. (4) The department of technology, management, and budget shall expend money from the fund, on appropriation, only for 1 or more of the following purposes: (a) To acquire aerial imagery and associated geospatial services for state agencies, counties, cities, townships, and villages through MiSAIL. (b) To form a public-private partnership or public-private partnerships to provide regularly updated aerial imagery and associated geospatial services of this state. (5) As used in this section, "MiSAIL" means the Michigan statewide authoritative imagery and LiDAR program administered through the center for shared solutions in the department of technology, management, and budget.